Louisiana, session 2026, SB42.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:81.1(B)(3) and (9) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§81.1. Child sexual abuse materials
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(3) "Child sexual abuse materials" is any photograph, videotape, film, or
other reproduction, whether electronic or otherwise undeveloped film, videotape,
or data stored on a computer disk or by electronic means that is capable of
conversion into a visual image, and also includes any photograph, film, video,
picture, digital image or picture, computer image or picture, or computer-
generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic,
mechanical, or other means, of any sexual performance involving a child under the
age of seventeen. For purposes of this Paragraph, "child" includes both a
natural person under the age of seventeen years and an image or other visual
representation of a child under the age of seventeen years that is created or
generated by electronic or digital means, including artificial intelligence, and
that, to a reasonable person, is a virtually indistinguishable depiction of a child
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 42 ENROLLED
under the age of seventeen years.
* * *
(9) "Produce" means to photograph, videotape, film, cause to be digitally
generated, including by artificial intelligence, or otherwise reproduce child sexual
abuse materials, or to solicit, promote, or coerce any child for the purpose of child
sexual abuse materials.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.